California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that the regular receipt of child support in the preceding reporting period be considered in determining
 reasonably anticipated income for the following reporting period.

(3) In accordance with Sections 11265.2 and 11265.46, if the income of an assistance unit described in paragraph (1) includes reasonably anticipated income derived from child support, the amount established in Section 17504 of the Family Code and Section 11475.3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code of any amount of child support received each month shall not be considered income or resources and shall not be deducted from the amount of aid to which the assistance unit otherwise would be eligible.

(d) This section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2024, or the date that the Department of Social Services has determined that necessary automation within the Statewide Automated Welfare System can be complete, whichever date is later,
 and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 573, Sec. 18.   (AB 207)   Effective September 27, 2022.   Conditionally repealed on or after January 1, 2024, as prescribed by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 19 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 573.)
-------------------------------------------

11477.

As a condition of eligibility for aid paid under this chapter, each applicant or recipient shall do all of the following:

(a) (1) Do either of the following:

(A) For applications received before October 1, 2009, assign to the county any rights to support from any other person the applicant or recipient may have on their own behalf or on behalf of any other family member for whom the applicant or recipient is applying for or receiving aid, not exceeding the total amount of cash assistance provided to the family under this chapter. Receipt of public assistance under this chapter operates as an assignment by operation of law. An assignment of support rights to the county shall also
 constitute an assignment to the state. If support rights are assigned pursuant to this subdivision, the assignee may become an assignee of record by the local child support agency or other public official filing with the court clerk an affidavit showing that an assignment has been made or that there has been an assignment by operation of law. This procedure does not limit any other means by which the assignee may become an assignee of record.

(B) For applications received on or after October 1, 2009, assign to the county any rights to support from any other person the applicant or recipient may have on their own behalf, or on behalf of any other family member for whom the applicant or recipient is applying for or receiving aid. The assignment shall apply only to support that accrues during the period of time that the applicant is receiving assistance under this chapter, and shall not exceed the total amount of cash assistance provided to the
 family under this chapter. Receipt of public assistance under this chapter shall operate as an assignment by operation of law. An assignment of support rights to the county shall also constitute an assignment to the state. If support rights are assigned pursuant to this subdivision, the assignee may become an assignee of record by the local child support agency or other public official filing with the court clerk an affidavit showing that an assignment has been made or that there has been an assignment by operation of law. This procedure does not limit any other means by which the assignee may become an assignee of record.

(2) Support that has been assigned pursuant to paragraph (1) and that accrues while the family is receiving aid under this chapter shall be permanently assigned until the entire amount of aid paid has been reimbursed.

(3) If the federal government does not
 permit states to adopt the same order of distribution for preassistance and postassistance child support arrears that are assigned on or after October 1, 1998, support arrears that accrue before the family receives aid under this chapter that are assigned pursuant to this subdivision shall be assigned as follows:

(A) Child support assigned prior to January 1, 1998, shall be permanently assigned until aid is no longer received and the entire amount of aid has been reimbursed.

(B) Child support assigned on or after January 1, 1998, but prior to October 1, 2000, shall be temporarily assigned until aid under this chapter is no longer received and the entire amount of aid paid has been reimbursed or until October 1, 2000, whichever comes first.

(C) On or after October 1, 2000, support assigned pursuant to this subdivision
 that was not otherwise permanently assigned shall be temporarily assigned to the county until aid is no longer received.

(D) On or after October 1, 2000, support that was temporarily assigned pursuant to this subdivision shall, when a payment is received from the federal tax intercept program, be temporarily assigned until the entire amount of aid paid has been reimbursed.

(4) If the federal government permits states to adopt the same order of distribution for preassistance and postassistance child support arrears, child support arrears shall be assigned, as follows:

(A) Child support assigned pursuant to this subdivision prior to October 1, 1998, shall be assigned until aid under this chapter is no longer received and the entire amount has been reimbursed.

(B) On or after October 1, 1998, child support assigned pursuant to this subdivision that accrued before the family receives aid under this chapter and that was not otherwise permanently assigned shall be temporarily assigned until aid under this chapter is no longer received.

(C) On or after October 1, 1998, support that was temporarily assigned pursuant to this subdivision shall, when a payment is received from the federal tax intercept program, be temporarily assigned until the entire amount of aid paid has been reimbursed.

(b) (1) Cooperate with the county welfare department and local child support agency in establishing the paternity of a child of the applicant or recipient born out of wedlock with respect to whom aid is claimed, and in establishing, modifying, or enforcing a support order with respect to a child of the individual for whom
 aid is requested or obtained, unless the applicant or recipient qualifies for a good cause exception pursuant to Section 11477.04. The granting of aid shall not be delayed or denied if the applicant is otherwise eligible, completes the necessary forms, and agrees to cooperate with the local child support agency in securing support and determining paternity, if applicable. The local child support agency shall have staff available, in person or by telephone, at all county welfare offices and shall conduct an interview with each applicant to obtain information necessary to establish paternity and establish, modify, or enforce a support order at the time of the initial interview with the welfare office. The local child support agency shall make the determination of cooperation. If the applicant or recipient attests under penalty of perjury that they cannot provide the information required by this subdivision, the local child support agency shall make a finding regarding whether the individual could reasonably be
 expected to provide the information before the local child support agency determines whether the individual is cooperating. In making the finding, the local child support agency shall consider all of the following:

(A) The age of the child for whom support is sought.

(B) The circumstances surrounding the conception of the child.

(C) The age or mental capacity of the parent or caretaker of the child for whom aid is being sought.

(D) The time that has elapsed since the parent or caretaker last had contact with the alleged father or obligor.

(2) Cooperation includes all of the following:

(A) Providing the name of the alleged
 parent or obligor and other information about that person if known to the applicant or recipient, such as address, social security number, telephone number, place of employment or school, and the names and addresses of relatives or associates.

(B) Appearing at interviews, hearings, and legal proceedings, provided the applicant or recipient is provided with reasonable advance notice of the interview, hearing, or legal proceeding and does not have good cause not to appear.

(C) If paternity is at issue, submitting to genetic tests, including genetic testing of the child, if necessary.

(D) Providing any additional information known to, or reasonably obtainable by, the applicant or recipient necessary to establish paternity or to establish, modify, or enforce a child support order.

(3) A recipient or applicant shall not be required to sign a voluntary declaration of paternity, as set forth in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 7570) of Part 2 of Division 12 of the Family Code, as a condition of cooperation.

(c) (1) This section does not apply if all of the adults are excluded from the assistance unit pursuant to Section 11251.3, 11454, or 11486.5, or if all eligible adults have been subject to Section 11327.5 for at least 12 consecutive months.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that the regular receipt of child support in the preceding reporting period be considered in determining reasonably anticipated income for the following reporting period:

(3) In accordance with Sections 11265.2 and 11265.46, if the
 income of an assistance unit described in paragraph (1) includes reasonably anticipated income derived from support as defined in Section 150 of the Family Code, the amount established in Section 17504 of the Family Code, or an amount passed through under Section 17504.2 of the Family Code, of any amount of support received each month shall not be considered income or resources and shall not be deducted from the amount of aid to which the assistance unit otherwise would be eligible.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024, or the date that the Department of Social Services has determined that necessary automation within the Statewide Automated Welfare System can be complete, whichever is later.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 18) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 573, Sec. 19.   (AB 207)   Effective September 27, 2022.   Conditionally operative on or after January 1, 2024, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11477.02.

Prior to referral of any individual or recipient, or that person’s case, to the local child support agency for child support services under Section 17400 or 17404 of the Family Code, the county welfare department shall determine if an applicant or recipient has good cause for noncooperation, as set forth in Section 11477.04. If the applicant or recipient claims a good cause exception at any subsequent time to the county welfare department or the local child support agency, the local child support agency shall suspend child support services until the county
 welfare department determines the good cause claim, as set forth in Section 11477.04. If good cause is determined to exist, the local child support agency shall suspend child support services until the applicant or recipient requests their resumption, and shall take such other measures as are necessary to protect the applicant or recipient and the children. If the applicant or recipient is the parent of the child for whom aid is sought and the parent is found to have not cooperated without good cause as provided in Section 11477.04, the applicant’s or recipient’s family grant shall be reduced by 25 percent for such time as the failure to cooperate lasts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 126.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

11477.04.

(a) An applicant or a recipient shall be considered to be cooperating in good faith with the county welfare department or the local child support agency for purposes of Section 11477 and shall be eligible for aid, if otherwise eligible, if he or she cooperates or has good cause for noncooperation. The county welfare department shall make the good cause determination.

(b) Good cause shall be found if any of the following conditions exist:

(1) Efforts to establish paternity or establish, modify, or enforce a support obligation would increase the risk of physical, sexual, or emotional harm to the child for whom support is being sought.

(2) Efforts to establish paternity or establish, modify, or enforce a support obligation would increase the risk of abuse, as defined in Section 11495.1, to the parent or caretaker with whom the child is living.

(3) The child for whom support is sought was conceived as a result of incest or rape. A conviction for incest or rape is not necessary for this paragraph to apply.

(4) Legal proceedings for the adoption of the child are pending before a court of competent jurisdiction.

(5) The applicant or
 recipient is currently being assisted by a public or licensed private adoption agency to resolve the issue of whether to keep the child or relinquish the child for adoption.

(6) The applicant or recipient is cooperating in good faith but is unable to identify or assist in locating the alleged father or obligor.

(7) Any other reason that would make efforts to establish paternity or establish, modify, or enforce a support obligation contrary to the best interests of the child.

(c) Evidence supporting a claim for good cause includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) Police, governmental agency, or court records, documentation from a domestic violence program or a legal, clerical, medical, mental health, or other professional from whom the
 applicant or recipient has sought assistance in dealing with abuse, physical evidence of abuse, or any other evidence that supports the claim of good cause.

(2) Statements under penalty of perjury from individuals, including the applicant or recipient, with knowledge of the circumstances that provide the basis for the good cause claim.

(3) Birth certificates or medical, mental health, rape crisis, domestic violence program, or law enforcement records that indicate that the child was conceived as the result of incest or rape.

(4) Court documents or other records that indicate that legal proceedings for adoption are pending before a court of competent jurisdiction.

(5) A written statement from a public or licensed private adoption agency that the
 applicant or recipient is being assisted by the agency to resolve the issue of whether to keep the child or relinquish the child for adoption.

(d) A sworn statement by a victim shall be sufficient to establish abuse unless the agency documents in writing an independent, reasonable basis to find the recipient not credible.

(e) Applicants or recipients who inquire about or claim good cause, or otherwise indicate that they or their children are at risk of abuse, shall be given referrals by the county welfare department to appropriate community, legal, medical, and support services. Followup by the applicant or recipient on those referrals shall not affect eligibility for assistance under this chapter or the determination of cooperation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 478, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

11477.06.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that, subject to the requirements of Section 77 of Senate Bill 189 of the 2021–22 Regular Session (Ch. 48, Stats. 2022), commencing January 1, 2025, or on the date that the State Department of Social Services and the Department of Child Support Services determine that the Statewide Automated Welfare System (SAWS) and the California Child Support Enforcement System can perform the necessary automation for this purpose, whichever date is later, the State Department of Social Services and the Department of Child Support Services provide full passthrough of child support payments to families receiving CalWORKs benefits.

(b) It is further the intent of the Legislature that the State Department of Social
 Services provide a report to the Legislature evaluating the unintended impacts of the proposal described in subdivision (a) on or before April 1, 2024, and in advance of the determination required by Section 77 of Senate Bill 189 of the 2021–22 Regular Session (Ch. 48, Stats. 2022) related to a General Fund augmentation for the Department of Child Support Services and the State Department of Social Services to implement the full passthrough of child support payments collected to families that are currently receiving CalWORKs benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 573, Sec. 20.   (AB 207)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11477.07.

(a) The State Department of Social Services, in conjunction with the Department of Child Support Services, shall convene a workgroup that consists of representatives from the Legislature, the Department of Child Support Services, and the County Welfare Directors Association of California, and advocates for low-income families with children and noncustodial parents. The workgroup shall meet at least twice to discuss unintended consequences of enacting a full passthrough of child support payments to custodial families currently receiving CalWORKs benefits prior to the State Department of Social Services issuing the report required by subparagraph (b).

(b) The State Department of Social Services shall submit a report, on or before April 1,
 2024, to the Senate and Assembly human services committees, judiciary committees, and fiscal committees summarizing the conversations with participants in the workgroup, and including proposed mitigation strategies for preventing unintended consequences of a full passthrough of child support payments to families currently receiving CalWORKs benefits and any estimates of additional costs of implementing these recommended strategies. The report shall also include the estimated impact of federal funding levels and any estimated changes to eligibility and benefit determination for need-based assistance programs as a result of providing the full passthrough of child support payments, as well as any projected changes in behavior among obligors related to compliance with child support orders due to the full passthrough and any estimated change to income levels of custodial families as a result of those projected behavior changes.

(c) This
 section shall remain in effect only until January 10, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 573, Sec. 21.   (AB 207)   Effective September 27, 2022.   Repealed as of January 10, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11477.1.

No polygraph tests shall be administered to any applicant or recipient of aid under this chapter for the purposes of enforcement of Title IV-D of the Social Security Act, without written notice to applicant or recipient that such test is not required and without written consent thereto by such applicant or recipient.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 924.)
-------------------------------------------

11478.1.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to protect individual rights of privacy, and to facilitate and enhance the effectiveness of the child and spousal support enforcement program, by ensuring the confidentiality of support enforcement and child abduction records, and to thereby encourage the full and frank disclosure of information relevant to all of the following:

(1) The establishment or maintenance of parent and child relationships and support obligations.

(2) The enforcement of the child support liability of absent parents.

(3) The enforcement of
 spousal support liability of the spouse or former spouse to the extent required by the state plan under Section 11475.2 of this code and Part 6 (commencing with Section 5700.101) of Division 9 of the Family Code.

(4) The location of absent parents.

(5) The location of parents and children abducted, concealed, or detained by them.

(b) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (c), all files, applications, papers, documents, and records established or maintained by any public entity pursuant to the administration and implementation of the child and spousal support enforcement program established pursuant to Part D (commencing with Section 651) of Subchapter IV of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code
 and this article, shall be confidential, and shall not be open to examination or released for disclosure for any purpose not directly connected with the administration of the child and spousal support enforcement program. No public entity shall disclose any file, application, paper, document, or record, or the information contained therein, except as expressly authorized by this section.

(2) In no case shall information be released or the whereabouts of one party or the child disclosed to another party, or to the attorney of any other party, if a protective order has been issued by a court or administrative agency with respect to the former party, a good cause claim under Section 11477.04 has been approved or is pending, or the public agency responsible for establishing paternity or enforcing support has reason to believe that the release of
 the information may result in physical or emotional harm to the former party or the child.

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a proof of service filed by the district attorney shall not disclose the address where service of process was accomplished. Instead, the district attorney shall keep the address in the district attorney’s own records. The proof of service shall specify that the address is on record at the district attorney’s office and that the address may be released only upon an order from the court pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (c). The district attorney shall, upon request by a party served, release to that person the address where service was effected.

(c) Disclosure of the information described in subdivision (b) is authorized as follows:

(1) All files, applications, papers, documents, and records as described in subdivision (b) shall be available and may be used by a public entity for all administrative, civil, or criminal investigations, actions, proceedings, or prosecutions conducted in connection with the administration of the child and spousal support enforcement program approved under Part D (commencing with Section 651) of Subchapter IV of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code, and any other plan or program described in Section 303.21 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations and to the county welfare department responsible for administering a program operated under a state plan pursuant to Subpart 1 or 2 of Part B or Part E of Subchapter IV of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) A document requested by a person who wrote, prepared, or furnished the document may be examined by or disclosed to that person or the person’s designee.

(3) The payment history of an obligor pursuant to a support order may be examined by or released to the court, the obligor, or the person on whose behalf enforcement actions are being taken or that person’s designee.

(4) Income and expense information of either parent may be released to the other parent for the purpose of establishing or modifying a support order.

(5) Public records subject to disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) may be released.

(6) After a noticed motion and a finding by the court, in a case in which establishment or enforcement actions are being taken, that release or disclosure to the obligor or obligee is required by due process of law, the court may order a public entity that possesses an application, paper, document, or record as described in subdivision (b) to make that item available to the obligor or obligee for examination or copying, or to disclose to the obligor or obligee the contents of that item. Article 9 (commencing with Section 1040) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code shall not be applicable to proceedings under this part. At any hearing of a motion filed pursuant to this section, the court shall inquire of the district attorney and the parties appearing at the hearing if there is reason to believe that release of the requested information
 may result in physical or emotional harm to a party. If the court determines that harm may occur, the court shall issue any protective orders or injunctive orders restricting the use and disclosure of the information as are necessary to protect the individuals.

(7) To the extent not prohibited by federal law or regulation, information indicating the existence or imminent threat of a crime against a child; location of a concealed, detained, or abducted child; or the location of the concealing, detaining, or abducting person, may be disclosed to any district attorney, any appropriate law enforcement agency, or to any state or county child protective agency, or may be used in any judicial proceedings to prosecute that crime or to protect the child.

(8) (A) The
 social security number, most recent address, and the place of employment of the absent parent may be released to an authorized person as defined in Section 653(c) of Title 42 of the United States Code, only if the authorized person has filed a request for the information, and only if the information has been provided to the California Parent Locator Service by the federal Parent Locator Service pursuant to Section 653 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(B) The information described in subparagraph (A) may be disclosed to the county child welfare agency and the county probation department responsible for administering a program operated under a state plan pursuant to Subpart 1 (commencing with Section 621) or 2 (commencing with Section 629) of Part B of, or pursuant to Part E (commencing with Section 670) of, Subchapter IV of
 Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code. Information exchanged between the California Parent Locator Service or the California Child Support Automation System, or its replacement, and the county welfare agency shall be through automated processes to the maximum extent feasible.

(C) On or before July 1, 2013, the State Department of Social Services and the Department of Child Support Services shall issue an all-county letter or similar instruction explaining that county child welfare and probation agencies are entitled to the information described in paragraph (9) of subdivision (c) of Section 17212 and subdivision (c) of Section 17506 of the Family Code.

(d) (1) “Administration and implementation of the child and spousal support enforcement program,” as
 used in this section, means the carrying out of the state and local plans for establishing, modifying, and enforcing child support obligations, enforcing spousal support orders, and determining paternity pursuant to Part D (commencing with Section 651) of Subchapter IV of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code and this article.

(2) For purposes of this section, “obligor” means any person owing a duty of support.

(3) As used in this chapter, “putative parent” shall refer to any person reasonably believed to be the parent of a child for whom the local child support agency is attempting to establish paternity or establish, modify, or enforce support pursuant to Section 17400 of the Family Code.

(e) Any person
 who willfully, knowingly, and intentionally
 violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to compel the disclosure of information relating to a deserting parent who is a recipient of aid under a public assistance program for which federal aid is paid to this state, if that information is required to be kept confidential by the federal law or regulations relating to the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 437.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

11479.

In all cases in which the paternity of the child has not been established to the satisfaction of the county department, the county department shall refer the applicant to local child support agency at the time the application is signed. Upon the advice of a county department that a child is being considered for adoption, and regardless of whether or not the whereabouts of the parent is known, the local child support agency shall delay the investigation and other action with respect to the case until advised that the adoption is no longer under consideration. The
 local child support agency shall conduct such investigation as the agency considers necessary, and where he or she deems it appropriate, the agency may bring an action under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 7630) of Part 3 of Division 12 of the Family Code. When the cause is at issue, it shall be set for trial at the earliest possible date and shall take precedence over all other cases except older matters of the same character and matters to which precedence may be given by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 478, Sec. 46.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

11480.

Any person other than a needy child, who willfully and knowingly receives or uses any part of an aid grant paid pursuant to this chapter for a purpose other than support of the needy children and the caretaker involved, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

11481.

If the district attorney, during the course of any investigation made by him pursuant to this article, determines that any person has committed any act or has omitted the performance of any duty, which act or omission causes or tends to cause or encourage any child receiving aid under this chapter to come within the provisions of Sections 300, 601, or 602 of this code, the district attorney shall prosecute such person under the provisions of Section 272 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

11481.5.

The department shall evaluate the effectiveness of a 24-hour welfare fraud hotline pilot project, to assess greater public involvement and assistance in welfare fraud detection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1448, Sec. 3.5.)
-------------------------------------------

11482.

Any person other than a needy child, who willfully and knowingly, with the intent to deceive, makes a false statement or representation or knowingly fails to disclose a material fact to obtain aid, or who, knowing he or she is not entitled thereto, attempts to obtain aid or to continue to receive aid to which he or she is not entitled, or a larger amount than that to which he or she is legally entitled, is guilty of a misdemeanor, except as specified in Section 11482.5 and shall be subject to prosecution under the provisions of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 10980) of Part 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1448, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

11482.5.

Any person who knowingly makes more than one application for aid with the intent of establishing multiple entitlements for any person for the same period, or who makes an application for aid by claiming a false identity for any person or by making an application for a fictitious or nonexistent person, is guilty of a felony and shall be subject to prosecution under the provisions of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 10980) of Part 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1448, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

11483.

Except as specified in Section 11483.5, whenever any person has, by means of false statement or representation or by impersonation or other fraudulent device, obtained aid for a child not in fact entitled thereto, the person obtaining such aid shall be subject to prosecution under the provisions of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 10980) of Part 2.

When the allegation is limited to failure to report not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) of income or resources, or the failure to report the presence of an additional person or persons in the household, all actions necessary to secure restitution shall be
 brought against persons in violation of Section 10980. The action for restitution may be satisfied by sending a registered letter requesting restitution to the last address at which the person was receiving public assistance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1448, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

11483.5.

Any person who obtains more than one aid payment for any person as a result of knowingly making more than one application for aid with the intent of establishing multiple entitlements for that person during the same period, or who obtains aid for any person by making an application claiming a false identity or by making an application for a fictitious or nonexistent person, is guilty of a felony, and shall be subject to prosecution under the provisions of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 10980) of Part 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1448, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

11484.

On request, all state, county, and local agencies shall cooperate with an investigator of an agency whose primary function is to detect, prevent, or prosecute public assistance fraud, by providing all information on hand relative to the location and prosecution of any person who has, by means of false statement or representation or by impersonation or other fraudulent device, obtained aid, or attempted to obtain aid for an individual under this chapter. That information is subject to confidentiality requirements under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 10850) of
 Part 2. For purposes of this section, “information” shall not include taxpayer return information as defined in Section 19549 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, unless disclosure of this information is expressly authorized pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 19501) of Chapter 7 of Part 10.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 128.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

11485.

If, to the knowledge of the court, aid has been applied for or granted to a child of parents who are engaged in a divorce or separate maintenance action which is pending, or if the court at any stage of the litigation believes that within the near future there is a likelihood that aid will be applied for on behalf of the child, the court shall direct the clerk to notify the local child support agency and the county department of the pending action.

In any case in which aid has been applied for on behalf of the child, and
 the county department has knowledge that an action for divorce or separate maintenance has been filed, it shall be the duty of the county director to notify the court that aid is being paid or has been applied for, and to furnish to it such information as is available to the county department as to the financial resources of the parents which might be applied to child support.

The enforcement remedies provided the local child support agency under this article shall not preclude the use of any other remedy which he has under the law to enforce this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 478, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

11486.

(a) The needs of any individual who is a member of a family applying for, or receiving, aid under this chapter shall not be taken into account in making the determination under Section 11450 with respect to his or her family beginning on the date, or at any time thereafter, the individual is found in state or federal court or pursuant to an administrative hearing decision, including any determination made on the basis of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, to have committed any of the following acts:

(1) Making a fraudulent statement or representation with respect to the place of residence of the individual in order to receive assistance simultaneously from two or more states or
 counties.

(2) Submitting documents for nonexistent children, or submitting false documents for the purpose of showing ineligible children to be eligible for aid.

(3) When there has been a receipt of cash benefits that exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000) as a result of intentionally and willfully doing any of the following acts for the purpose of establishing or maintaining the family’s eligibility for aid or increasing or preventing a reduction in the amount of aid:

(A) Making a false or misleading statement or misrepresenting, concealing, or withholding facts.

(B) Committing any act intended to mislead, misrepresent, conceal, or withhold facts or propound a falsity.

(b) The needs of
 any individual who is a member of a family applying for, or receiving, aid under this chapter shall not be taken into account in making the determination under Section 11450 with respect to his or her family for the following periods beginning on the date or any time thereafter the individual is convicted of a felony in state or federal court, including any determination made on the basis of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, for committing fraud in the receipt or attempted receipt of aid:

(1) For two years, if the amount of aid is less than two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(2) For five years, if the amount of aid is two thousand dollars ($2,000) or more but is less than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(3) Permanently, if the amount of aid is five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more.

(c) (1) Except as provided in subdivisions (a) and (b), the needs of any individual who is a member of a family applying for, or receiving, aid under this chapter to whom paragraph (2) applies shall not be taken into account in making the determination under Section 11450 with respect to his or her family for the following periods:

(A) For a period of six months upon the first occasion of any offense referred to in paragraph (2).

(B) For a period of 12 months upon the second occasion of any of those offenses referred to in paragraph (2).

(C) Permanently, upon the third occasion of any offense referred to in subdivision (b) and paragraph (2).

(2) Except as provided in
 subdivisions (a), (b), and (d), paragraph (1) shall apply to any individual who is found by a federal or state court, or pursuant to a special administrative hearing meeting the requirements of regulations adopted by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services, including any determination made on the basis of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, to have done any of the following acts for the purpose of establishing or maintaining the family’s eligibility for aid or increasing, or preventing a reduction in, the amount of that aid:

(A) Making a false or misleading statement or misrepresenting, concealing, or withholding facts.

(B) Committing any act intended to mislead, misrepresent, conceal, or withhold facts or propound a falsity.

(d) (1) Except as provided in subdivisions (a) and
 (b), and notwithstanding subdivision (c), the needs of any individual who is a member of a family applying for, or receiving, aid under this chapter to whom paragraph (2) applies shall not be taken into account in making the determination under Section 11450 with respect to his or her family for the following periods:

(A) For a period of two years upon the first occasion of any offense referred to in paragraph (2).
